Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FORGOTTEN HEROES RANGES AND RETREAT.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to Forgotten Heroes Ranges and Retreat, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a new shooting range and retreat to accommodate handicapped individuals and disabled veterans. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end